Tennessee statutes. Title 48 Securities, Corporations And Associations
Part 4

Officers

48-58-401. Required officers.

A corporation has the officers described in its bylaws or designated by its board of directors in accordance with the bylaws; provided, that every corporation shall have a president and a secretary. Unless the charter or bylaws provide otherwise, officers shall be elected or appointed by the board of directors.

A duly appointed officer may appoint one (1) or more officers or assistant officers if authorized by the bylaws or the board of directors.

The bylaws or the board of directors shall delegate to one (1) of the officers responsibility for preparing minutes of the directors' and members' meetings and for authenticating records of the corporation.

The same individual may simultaneously hold more than one (1) office in a corporation, except the offices of president and secretary.

Acts 1987, ch. 242, § 8.40; 1989, ch. 445, § 7.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 7 Tenn. Juris., Corporations, §§ 57, 60.

48-58-402. Duties of officers.

Each officer has the authority and shall perform the duties set forth in the bylaws or, to the extent consistent with the bylaws, the duties prescribed by the board of directors or by direction of an officer authorized by the board of directors to prescribe the duties and authority of other officers.

Acts 1987, ch. 242, § 8.41.

48-58-403. Standards of conduct for officers.

An officer with discretionary authority shall discharge all duties under that authority:

In good faith;

With the care an ordinarily prudent person in a like position would exercise under similar circumstances; and

In a manner the officer reasonably believes to be in the best interests of the corporation.

In discharging such duties, an officer is entitled to rely on information, opinions, reports, or statements, including financial statements and other financial data, if prepared or presented by:

One (1) or more officers or employees of the corporation whom the officer reasonably believes to be reliable and competent in the matters presented; or

Legal counsel, public accountants, or other persons as to matters the officer reasonably believes are within the person's professional or expert competence.

The duty of an officer includes the obligation to inform:

The superior officer to whom, or the board of directors or the committee thereof to which, the officer reports, of information about the affairs of the nonprofit corporation known to the officer, within the scope of the officer's functions and known to the officer to be material to the superior officer, board or committee; and

The officer's superior officer, or another appropriate person within the nonprofit corporation, or the board of directors, or a committee thereof, of any action or probable material violation of law involving the corporation or material breach of duty to the corporation by an officer, employee, or agent of the corporation, that the officer believes has occurred or is likely to occur.

An officer is not acting in good faith if the officer has knowledge concerning the matter in question that makes reliance otherwise permitted by subsection (b) unwarranted.

An officer is not liable for any action taken as an officer or any failure to take any action, if the officer performed the duties of office in compliance with this section.

Acts 1987, ch. 242, § 8.42; 2014, ch. 899, § 42.

48-58-404. Resignation and removal of officers.

An officer may resign at any time by delivering notice to the corporation. A resignation is effective when the notice is effective unless the notice specifies a later effective date. If a resignation is made effective at a later date and the corporation accepts the later effective date, its board of directors may fill the pending vacancy before the effective date if the board provides that the successor does not take office until the effective date.

A board may remove any officer at any time with or without cause and any officer or assistant officer, if appointed by another officer, may likewise be removed by such officer.

Acts 1987, ch. 242, § 8.43.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 5-2603.

48-58-405. Contract rights of officers — Removal.

The appointment of an officer does not itself create contract rights.

An officer's removal does not affect the officer's contract rights, if any, with the corporation. An officer's resignation does not affect the corporation's contract rights, if any, with the officer.

Except as provided in the charter or bylaws, an officer may be removed at any time with or without cause by the appointing officer unless the board provides otherwise. In this section, “appointing officer” means the officer (including any successor to that officer) who appointed the officer resigning or being removed.

Acts 1987, ch. 242, § 8.44; 2014, ch. 899, § 43.

48-58-406. Release or assignment of life insurance on officers.

When a corporation, organized under the laws of this state, has caused or shall cause to be insured the life of any director, officer, agent, or employee, or when such corporation is named as a beneficiary in or assignee of any policy of life insurance, due authority to effect, assign, release, relinquish, convert, surrender, change the beneficiary, or to take any other action with reference to such insurance shall be sufficiently evidenced to the insurance company by a written statement to that effect, signed by the president or secretary or other corresponding officer of such corporation. Such statement shall be binding upon such corporation, and any act done or suffered to be done by it upon the faith thereof shall protect the insurance company concerned, without further inquiry into the validity of the corporate authority or the regularity of the corporate proceedings. No person shall be disqualified, by reason of interest in the subject matter, from acting as a director or as a member of the executive committee of such corporation, on any corporate procedure touching such insurance.

Acts 1987, ch. 242, § 8.45.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 5-2604.